Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 80.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-180
Action on plan of domestication by
domesticating limited liability company.

(ULLCA 1011) (a) A plan of domestication must be consented
to:

(1) by all the members,
subject to section 21-183, if the domesticating company is a limited liability
company; and

(2)
as provided in the domesticating company's governing statute, if the company
is a foreign limited liability company.

(b) Subject to any contractual rights, after a domestication
is approved, and at any time before articles of domestication are delivered
to the Secretary of State for filing under section 21-181, a domesticating
limited liability company may amend the plan or abandon the domestication:

(1) as provided in the
plan; or

(2)
except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, by the same consent as was required
to approve the plan.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 80.
January 1, 2011